Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF58.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1952XS (4) 91 jda/jh S.F. 58 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0t. Be subject to and comply with the 3 requirements of section 283A.6 relating to free school lunch 4 and breakfast programs in the same manner as a school district. 5 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 6 by adding the following new paragraph: 7 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the 8 requirements of section 283A.6 relating to free school lunch 9 and breakfast programs in the same manner as a school district. 10 Sec. 3. Section 283A.2, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 2. A school district shall operate or provide for the 13 operation of lunch programs at all attendance centers in 14 the district. A Unless required under section 283A.6, a 15 school district may operate or provide for the operation of 16 school breakfast programs at all attendance centers in the 17 district, or provide access to a school breakfast program at 18 an alternative site to students who wish to participate in a 19 school breakfast program. The programs shall provide students 20 with nutritionally adequate meals and shall be operated in 21 compliance with the rules of the state board of education and 22 pertinent federal law and regulation. The school lunch program 23 shall be provided for all students in each district who attend 24 public school four or more hours each school day and wish to 25 participate in a school lunch program. School districts may 26 provide school breakfast and lunch programs for other students. 27 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 283A.6 Free school lunch and breakfast 28 programs. 29 1. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 30 June 30, 2026, each school district described in chapter 31 274, accredited nonpublic school, charter school organized 32 under chapter 256E, and charter school or innovation zone 33 school organized under chapter 256F shall operate a program 34 under which breakfasts and lunches are served to students 35 -1- LSB 1952XS (4) 91 jda/jh 1/ 4 S.F. 58 in attendance at no charge to the student or the studentâs 1 family if the studentâs family has a family income that is less 2 than or equal to three hundred percent of the federal poverty 3 level as defined by the most recently revised poverty income 4 guidelines published by the United States department of health 5 and human services. Meals served pursuant to this subsection 6 shall be nutritionally adequate meals. This subsection is 7 repealed July 1, 2026. 8 2. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 9 June 30, 2027, each school district described in chapter 10 274, accredited nonpublic school, charter school organized 11 under chapter 256E, and charter school or innovation zone 12 school organized under chapter 256F shall operate a program 13 under which breakfasts and lunches are served to students 14 in attendance at no charge to the student or the studentâs 15 family if the studentâs family has a family income that is less 16 than or equal to four hundred percent of the federal poverty 17 level as defined by the most recently revised poverty income 18 guidelines published by the United States department of health 19 and human services. Meals served pursuant to this subsection 20 shall be nutritionally adequate meals. This subsection is 21 repealed July 1, 2027. 22 3. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, and for 23 each fiscal year thereafter, each school district described 24 in chapter 274, accredited nonpublic school, charter school 25 organized under chapter 256E, and charter school or innovation 26 zone school organized under chapter 256F shall operate a 27 program under which breakfasts and lunches are served to 28 students in attendance at no charge to the student or the 29 studentâs family. Meals served pursuant to this subsection 30 shall be nutritionally adequate meals. 31 4. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and for 32 each fiscal year thereafter, there is appropriated from the 33 general fund of the state to the department of education an 34 amount necessary to make the payments to school districts 35 -2- LSB 1952XS (4) 91 jda/jh 2/ 4 S.F. 58 described in chapter 274, accredited nonpublic schools, charter 1 schools organized under chapter 256E, and charter schools and 2 innovation zone schools organized under chapter 256F necessary 3 to cover the costs of providing school lunches and school 4 breakfasts pursuant to this section that are not covered by any 5 Act of Congress and appropriated to the state of Iowa for use 6 in connection with school breakfast or lunch programs. 7 5. The state board of education shall adopt rules pursuant 8 to chapter 17A to administer this section. 9 Sec. 5. Section 283A.10, Code 2025, is amended to read as 10 follows: 11 283A.10 School breakfast or lunch in nonpublic schools. 12 The Unless required under section 283A.6, the authorities 13 in charge of nonpublic schools may operate or provide for the 14 operation of school breakfast or lunch programs in schools 15 under their jurisdiction and may use funds appropriated to 16 them by the general assembly, gifts, funds received from sale 17 of school breakfasts or lunches under such programs, and any 18 other funds available to the nonpublic school. However, 19 unless required under section 283A.6, school breakfast or 20 lunch programs shall not be required in nonpublic schools. 21 The department of education shall direct the disbursement of 22 state funds to nonpublic schools for school breakfast or lunch 23 programs in the same manner as state funds are disbursed to 24 public schools. If a nonpublic school receives state funds for 25 the operation of a school breakfast or lunch program, meals 26 served under the program shall be nutritionally adequate meals, 27 as defined in section 283A.1 . 28 Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 29 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 30